Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2068.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5607YH (3) 91 ss/ns H.F. 2068 Section 1. Section 43.92, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 43.92 Date , time, and place of caucus published. 3 The date, time, and place of each precinct caucus of a 4 political party shall be published at least twice , either in 5 at least one newspaper of general circulation in the precinct 6 or on an official social media account of the political party . 7 The first publication shall be made not more than fifteen 8 days nor less than seven days before the date of the caucus 9 and the second shall be made not more than seven days before 10 and not later than the date of the caucus. Such publication 11 shall also state in substance that each voter affiliated with 12 the specified political party may attend the precinct caucus. 13 Publication in a news item or advertisement in such a newspaper 14 shall constitute publication for the purposes of this section . 15 The cost of such publication, if any, shall be paid by the 16 political party. 17